th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตกปลา > รอกตกปลา: รอกตกปลาเบทคาสติ้ง; รอกธนูยิงปลา; รอกตกปลาเซ็นเตอร์พิน; รอกตกปลาไฟฟ้า; รอกตกปลาฟลาย; รอกตกปลาแบบสายมือ; รอกตกปลาน้ำแข็ง; รอกเพลเนอร์บอร์ด; รอกปืนฉมวกตกปลา; รอกตกปลาสปินคาสต์; รอกตกปลาสปินนิ่ง; รอกตกปลาทริกเกอร์สปิน; รอกตกปลาทรอลิ่ง
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ψάρεμα > Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος: Μηχανισμοί οριζοντίου τυμπάνου; Μηχανισμοί Bowfishing (ψάρεμα με τόξο); Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος Centerpin; Ηλεκτρικοί μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος; Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος μύγας; Καρούλια ψαρέματος για πεταχτάρι; Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος σε πάγο; Μηχανισμοί για Planer Boards; Μουλινέ ψαροντούφεκου; Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος Spincast; Μηχανισμοί κάθετου τυμπάνου; Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος Triggerspin; Μηχανισμοί ψαρέματος συρτής
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Vissen > Haspels: Baitcasting-haspels; Boogvisreels; Centerpin-haspels; Elektrische visreels; Vlieghaspels; Reels voor handlijnvissen; IJsvisreels; Planerboardreels; Reels voor harpoengeweren; Spincast-haspels; Spinning-haspels; Triggerspin-haspels; Trolling-haspels
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Fiskeri > Fiskehjul: Baitcasting fiskehjul; Hjul til buefiskeri; Centerpin fiskehjul; Elektriske fiskehjul; Fluefiskerhjul; Hjul til håndliner; Hjul til isfiskeri; Hjul til planerboards; Hjul til harpuner; Spincast fiskehjul; Spinningfiskehjul; Triggerspin fiskehjul; Trolling fiskehjul
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Риболов > Макари за риболов: Байтскастинг риболовни макари; Макари за риболовни лъкове; Риболовни макари с централен вал; Електрически риболовни макари; Мухарски макари; Макари за ръчен риболов; Макари за риболов на лед; Макари за планер борд; Риболовни макари за харпун; Кастинг макари; Безинерционни риболовни макари; Макари със заден аванс; Мултипликатор за тролинг риболов
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Pêche > Moulinets: Moulinets baitcasting; Moulinets de pêche à l’arc; Moulinets Centerpin; Moulinets de pêche électriques; Moulinets de pêche à la mouche; Moulinets de pêche à la main; Moulinets de pêche sur glace; Moulinets pour paravane; Moulinets d’arbalète de chasse sous-marine; Moulinets Spincast; Moulinets tournants; Moulinets Triggerspin; Moulinets traîne
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pesca > Mulinelli da pesca: Mulinelli da pesca con baitcasting; Mulinelli per pesca con l'arco; Mulinelli da pesca con perno centrale; Mulinelli da pesca elettrici; Mulinelli da pesca a mosca; Mulinelli per lenze a mano; Mulinelli per pesca nel ghiaccio; Mulinelli per divergenti; Mulinelli per fucili subacquei; Mulinelli da pesca Spincast; Mulinelli da pesca spinning; Mulinelli da pesca Triggerspin; Mulinelli da pesca alla traina
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 낚시 > 낚시릴: 베이트캐스팅 낚시릴; 보우피싱 릴; 센터핀 낚시릴; 전동 낚시 릴; 플라이 낚시릴; 얼레 낚시 릴; 얼음 낚시 릴; 플래너 보드 릴; 작살총 낚시 릴; 스핀캐스트 낚시릴; 스피닝 낚시릴; 트리거스핀 낚시릴; 트롤링 낚시릴
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Balıkçılık > Olta Makineleri: Baitcasting Balıkçılık Makaraları; Yayla balık avı makineleri; Centerpin Balıkçılık Makaraları; Elektrikli olta makineleri; Sinek Balıkçılığı Makaraları; Kasnak olta makineleri; Buz balıkçılığı makineleri; Planer board makineleri; Zıpkın olta makineleri; Spincast Balıkçılık Makaraları; Dönen Balıkçılık Makaraları; Triggerspin Balıkçılık Makaraları; Trolling Balıkçılık Makaraları
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Fishing > Fishing Reels: Baitcasting Fishing Reels; Bowfishing Reels; Centerpin Fishing Reels; Electric Fishing Reels; Fly Fishing Reels; Handline Fishing Reels; Ice Fishing Reels; Planer Board Reels; Speargun Fishing Reels; Spincast Fishing Reels; Spinning Fishing Reels; Triggerspin Fishing Reels; Trolling Fishing Reels
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Рыбалка > Рыболовные катушки: Катушки для заброса приманки; Катушки для боуфишинга; Инерционные катушки; Электрические рыболовные катушки; Нахлыстовые катушки; Мотовила и катушки для ручной ловли; Катушки для зимней рыбалки; Планерные катушки (для троллинга); Катушки для подводных ружей; Кастинговые катушки; Спиннинговые катушки; Катушки закрытого типа; Троллинговые катушки
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Câu cá > Tang câu: Tang câu cá ném mồi; Máy câu cung; Tang câu cá chốt định tâm; Máy câu điện; Tang câu cá bay; Ống bôbin câu tay; Máy câu băng; Máy cuộn dây ván lướt câu cá; Máy cuộn dây súng bắn cá; Tang câu cá thả mồi; Tang câu cá quay; Tang câu cá chốt nhả; Tang câu cá ống dây
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Rybolov > Rybárske navijaky: Rybárske navijaky na baitcasting; Navijaky na bowfishing; Rybárske muškárske navijaky; Elektrické rybárske navijaky; Muškárske navijaky; Ručné rybárske navijaky; Navijáky na rybolov na ľade; Navijaky pre trollingové odkláňacie dosky; Navijaky na harpúny; Rybárske navijaky Spincast; Prívlačové rybárske navijaky; Rybárske navijaky Triggerspin; Multiplikátorové rybárske navijaky
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Ribolov > Ribiški koluti: Ribiški koluti za metanje vab; Koluti za ribarjenje z lokom; Ribiški koluti s sredinskim trnkom; Električne ribiške role; Ribiški koluti za muharjenje; Ribiški koluti za ribarjenje na roko; Koluti ribarjenje v ledu; Role za bočne planerje; Role za podvodne puške; Zaprti ribiški koluti; Vrtljivi ribiški koluti; Ribiški koluti Triggerspin; Ribiški koluti za panuliranje
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Rybaření > Rybářské navijáky: Rybářské navijáky – baitcast; Navijáky pro lov ryb lukem; Rybářské navijáky – centerpin; Elektrické rybářské navijáky; Muškařské navijáky; Ruční navijáky pro lov na šňůru; Navijáky pro lov na dírkách; Navijáky pro trollingové paravany; Navijáky na harpuny; Rybářské navijáky – spincast; Rybářské navijáky – spinningové; Rybářské navijáky – triggerspin; Rybářské navijáky – trolling
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 釣り > 釣り用リール: ベイトキャスティング フィッシングリール; ボウフィッシング用リール; センターピンフィッシングリール; 電動リール; フライフィッシングリール; 手釣り用リール; 氷上釣り用リール; プレーナーボードリール; スピアガン用リール; スピンキャスト フィッシングリール; スピニングフィッシングリール; トリガースピンフィッシングリール; トローリングフィッシングリール
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žvejyba > Žvejybos ritės: „Baitcasting“ tipo ritės; Lankinės žvejybos ritės; „Centerpin“ tipo ritės; Elektrinės žvejybinių ričių sistemos; Muselinės žvejybos ritės; Rankinės žvejybos ritės; Poledinės žvejybos ritės; Planer lentų ritės; Harpūnų ritės žvejybai; „Spincast“ tipo ritės; Spininginės ritės; „Triggerspin“ tipo ritės; Velkamosios žvejybos ritės
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Angeln > Angelrollen: Baitcast-Rollen; Bogenfischen-Rollen; Centrepin-Rollen; Elektrische Angelrollen; Fliegenrollen; Handangeln; Eisangelrollen; Planerboard-Rollen; Harpunen-Rollen; Spincast-Rollen; Spinning-Rollen; Spinnrollen; Trolling-Rollen
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 釣魚 > 釣魚繞線器: 小烏龜梭形釣魚捲線器; 射魚捲線器; 前打輪釣魚捲線器; 電動捲線器; 飛蠅釣釣魚捲線器; 手線捲線器; 冰釣捲線器; 拖釣板捲線器; 魚槍捲線器; 飛梭釣魚捲線器; 紡車輪釣魚捲線器; 扳旋輪釣魚捲線器; 鼓輪釣魚捲線器
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Horgászat > Horgászorsók: Baitcasting horgászorsók; Íjhorgász-orsók; Középtűs horgászorsók; Elektromos horgászorsók; Légy-horgászorsók; Kézi horgászorsók; Lékhorgászorsók; Siklódeszka-orsók; Szigonyorsók; Spincast horgászorsók; Forgó horgászorsók; Pergető horgászorsók; Trolling horgászorsók
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Pesca > Carretéis de pesca: Carretéis de pesca para lançamento de iscas; Carretilhas para pesca com arco; Carretéis de pesca com pino central; Carretilhas de pesca elétricas; Carretéis de pesca com mosca; Carretéis de mão para pesca; Carretilhas para pesca no gelo; Carretéis para planer boards; Carretilhas para arpão; Carretilhas de pesca spincast; Carretéis de pesca para spinning; Carretéis de pesca com gatilho; Carretéis de pesca de corrico
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kalastus > Kalastuskelat: Houkutuskalastuskelat; Jousikalastuskelat; Keskipinnikalastuskelat; Sähkökelat; Perhokalastuskelat; Käsisiimakelat; Pilkkikelat; Plaanarikelat; Harppuunoiden kelat; Heittohyrräkelat; Hyrräkelat; Umpikelat; Avokelat
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Pesca > Carretes de pesca: Carretes de pesca de cebo; Carretes para pesca con arco; Carretes de pesca con pasador central; Carretes de pesca eléctricos; Carretes de pesca con mosca; Carretes para pesca con línea de mano; Carretes para pesca en hielo; Carretes para tablas de curricán; Carretes para fusiles de pesca submarina; Carretes de pesca Spincast; Carretes de pesca giratorios; Carretes de pesca de gatillo; Carretes de pesca de arrastre
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Pesca > Carretos de canas de pesca: Carretos de pesca para lançamento de isco; Carretos para pesca com arco; Carretos de pesca com pino central; Carretos de pesca elétricos; Carretos de canas de pesca de mosca; Carretos de pesca à linha de mão; Carretos para pesca no gelo; Carretos para pranchas divergentes; Carretos para armas de caça submarina; Carretos de canas de bobina; Carretos de pesca de bobina móvel; Carretos de pesca triggerspin; Carretos de pesca de corrico
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Fiske > Fiskerullar: Haspelfiskerullar; Bågfiskerullar; Centerpin-fiskerullar; Elektriska fiskerullar; Flugfiskerullar; Handvindor för fiske; Pimpelrullar; Rullar för trollingpulkor; Rullar för harpungevär; Spinnspöfiskerullar; Spinnfiskerullar; Triggerspin-fiskerullar; Trollingfiskerullar
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Rybołówstwo > Kołowrotki wędkarskie: Kołowrotki castingowe; Kołowrotki do łucznictwa wędkarskiego; Kołowrotki wędkarskie Centerpin; Elektryczne kołowrotki wędkarskie; Kołowrotki wędkarskie muchowe; Zwijadła do łowienia z ręki; Kołowrotki podlodowe; Zwijarki do planerów; Kołowrotki do kusz podwodnych; Kołowrotki wędkarskie Spincast; Kołowrotki wędkarskie spinningowe; Kołowrotki wędkarskie Triggerspin; Kołowrotki trollingowe
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 钓鱼 > 鱼线轮: 抛饵式鱼线轮; 弓钓渔轮; 中心销式渔线轮; 电动渔轮; 飞钓式渔线轮; 手抛线轮; 冰钓渔轮; 拖钓滑板渔轮; 鱼枪渔轮; 投掷式渔线轮; 旋转式渔线轮; 扣机销渔线轮; 拖钓式渔线轮
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Ribolov > Ribolovne role: Baitcasting ribolovne role; Role za ribolov samostrelom; Ribolovne role sa središnjom osovinom; Električne ribolovne role; Mušičarske ribolovne role; Ručne ribolovne role; Role za ribolov u ledu; Role za panulanje; Role za podvodni ribolov; Spincast ribolovne role; Spin ribolovne role; Ribolovne role s okidačem; Role za ribolov na trolling
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Pescuit > Mulinete: Mulinete baitcasting; Mulinete pentru pescuit cu arcul; Mulinete cu ax central; Mulinete electrice pentru pescuit; Mulinete pentru pescuit la muscă; Mulinete de mână pentru pescuit; Mulinete pentru pescuit la copcă; Mulinete pentru plăci de deviație; Mulinete pentru lansatoare de harpoane; Mulinete spincast; Mulinete spinning; Mulinete triggerspin; Mulinete pentru pescuit la troliu
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Fisking > Fiskesneller: Baitcastsneller; Buefiskesneller; Centerpinsneller; Elektriske fiskesneller; Fluesneller; Håndsnører; Isfiskesneller; Planerboard-sneller; Harpunsneller; Spincastsneller; Spinsneller; Triggerspinsneller; Trollingsneller